dictionaries/hu/index.aff
SFX s 0 aidéról [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21542
SFX s 0 aidért [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21543
SFX s 0 aidéra [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21544
SFX s 0 aidénál [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21545
SFX s 0 aidénak [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21546
SFX s 0 aidén [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21547
SFX s 0 aidéiért [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21549
SFX s 0 aidéivá [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21550
SFX s 0 aidéival [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21551
SFX s 0 aidéiul [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21548
SFX s 0 aidéitól [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21552
SFX s 0 aidéit [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21553
SFX s 0 aidéiról [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21554
SFX s 0 aidéira [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21555
SFX s 0 aidéinál [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21556
SFX s 0 aidéinak [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21557
SFX s 0 aidéin [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21558
SFX s 0 aidéiig [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21559
SFX s 0 aidéihoz [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21560
SFX s 0 aidéig [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21561
SFX s 0 aidéiból [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21562
SFX s 0 aidéiban [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21563
SFX s 0 aidéiba [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21564
SFX s 0 aidéi [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21565
SFX s 0 aidéhoz [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21566
SFX s 0 aidéból [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21567
SFX s 0 aidéban [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21568
SFX s 0 aidéba [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21569
SFX s 0 aidé [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21570
SFX s 0 aidul [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21535
SFX s 0 aidtól [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21571
SFX s 0 aidról [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21572
SFX s 0 aidra [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21573
SFX s 0 aidon [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21581
SFX s 0 aidnál [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21574
SFX s 0 aidnak [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21575
SFX s 0 aidként [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21576
SFX s 0 aidkor [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21577
SFX s 0 aidig [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21578
SFX s 0 aidhoz [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21579
SFX s 0 aiddá [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21582
SFX s 0 aiddal [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21583
SFX s 0 aidból [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21584
SFX s 0 aidban [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21585
SFX s 0 aidba [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21586
SFX s 0 aidat [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21580
SFX s 0 aid [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21587
SFX s 0 aiból [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21588
SFX s 0 aiban [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21589
SFX s 0 aiba [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21590
SFX s 0 ai [cghjmsxyvzbdfklnprt-] 21591
     
SFX q N 9 
SFX q 0 -szerűség/1201 . 21592
SFX q 0 -szerű/1223 . 21593
SFX q 0 -féleség/1201 . 21594
SFX q 0 -féle/1245 . 21595
SFX q 0 -forma/1225 . 21596
SFX q 0 -fajtaság/1204 . 21597
SFX q 0 -fajta/1225 . 21598
SFX q 0 -beliség/1201 . 21599
SFX q 0 -beli/1245 . 21600
SFX p Y 251 
SFX p ztik szük sztik 21601
SFX p ztik szük sztik 21602
SFX p ztik szétek sztik 21603
SFX p ztik szétek sztik 21604
SFX p ztik szék sztik 21605
SFX p ztik szék sztik 21606
SFX p zt szük szt 21601
SFX p zt szétek szt 21603
SFX p zt szék szt 21605
SFX p zt szem szt 21607
SFX p zt szelek szt 21608
SFX p zt szed szt 21609
SFX p zt sze szt 21610
SFX p zik szük szik 21601
SFX p zik szük szik 21602
SFX p zik szétek szik 21604
SFX p zik szék szik 21605
SFX p zik szék szik 21606
SFX p zik szem szik 21607
SFX p zik szelek szik 21608
SFX p zik szed szik 21609
SFX p zik sze szik 21610
SFX p zik dzük dzik 21601
SFX p zik dzük dzik 21602
SFX p zik dzétek dzik 21604
SFX p zik dzék dzik 21605
SFX p zik dzék dzik 21606
SFX p zik dzlek dzik 21608
SFX p zik dzem dzik 21607
SFX p zik dze dzik 21610
SFX p zik dzd dzik 21609
SFX p z szük sz 21601
SFX p z szék sz 21605
SFX p z szem sz 21607
SFX p z szelek sz 21608
SFX p z szed sz 21609
SFX p z sze sz 21610
SFX p z dzük dz 21601
SFX p z dzék dz 21605
SFX p z dzem dz 21607
SFX p z dzelek dz 21608
SFX p z dzed dz 21609
SFX p z dze dz 21610
SFX p tik ssük [üöieuoa]tik 21602
SFX p tik ssétek [üöieuoa]tik 21604
SFX p tik ssék [üöieuoa]tik 21606
SFX p t ssük [üöieuoa]t 21601
SFX p t ssétek [üöieuoa]t 21603
SFX p t ssék [üöieuoa]t 21605
SFX p t ssem [üöieuoa]t 21607
SFX p t sselek [üöieuoa]t 21608
SFX p t ssed [üöieuoa]t 21609
SFX p t sse [üöieuoa]t 21610
SFX p t sd [üöieuoa]t 21609
SFX p t d szt 21609
SFX p l lek ll 21611
SFX p ik öttük lik 21612
SFX p ik öttétek lik 21613
SFX p ik ötték lik 21614
SFX p ik öttem lik 21615
SFX p ik öttelek lik 21616
SFX p ik ötted lik 21617
SFX p ik ötte lik 21618
SFX p ik öm ik 21619
SFX p ik öd ik 21620
SFX p ik zük [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21601
SFX p ik zük [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21602
SFX p ik zétek [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21603
SFX p ik zétek [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21604
SFX p ik zék [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21605
SFX p ik zék [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21606
SFX p ik zem [^ds]zik 21607
SFX p ik zelek [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21608
SFX p ik zed [^dsbkmnyzr]zik 21609
SFX p ik ze [^ds]zik 21610
SFX p ik tük [^l]ik 21612
SFX p ik tétek [^l]ik 21613
SFX p ik ték [^l]ik 21614
SFX p ik tem [^l]ik 21615
SFX p ik telek [^l]ik 21616
SFX p ik ted [^l]ik 21617
SFX p ik te [^l]ik 21618
SFX p ik sük sik 21601
SFX p ik sük sik 21602
SFX p ik sük [^szüöieuoa]tik 21602
SFX p ik sétek sik 21603
SFX p ik sétek sik 21604
SFX p ik sétek [^szüöieuoa]tik 21604
SFX p ik sék sik 21605
SFX p ik sék sik 21606
SFX p ik sék [^szüöieuoa]tik 21606
SFX p ik sem sik 21607
SFX p ik selek sik 21608
SFX p ik sed sik 21609
SFX p ik se sik 21610
SFX p ik nők/1246 .ik 21621
SFX p ik nétek .ik 21622
SFX p ik nénk .ik 21621
SFX p ik ném .ik 21623
SFX p ik nélek .ik 21624
SFX p ik nék .ik 21625
SFX p ik néd .ik 21626
SFX p ik né .ik 21627
SFX p ik lek szik 21611
SFX p ik lek [^ldrz]ik 21611
SFX p ik lek [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik 21611
SFX p ik jük [^szt]ik 21601
SFX p ik jük [^szt]ik 21602
SFX p ik jétek [^szt]ik 21603
SFX p ik jétek [^szt]ik 21604
SFX p ik jék [^szt]ik 21605
SFX p ik jék [^szt]ik 21606
SFX p ik jem [^szt]ik 21607
SFX p ik jelek [^szt]ik 21608
SFX p ik jed [^szt]ik 21609
SFX p ik je [^szt]ik 21610
SFX p ik i ik 21628
SFX p ik elek [s][ld]ik 21611
SFX p ik elek [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik 21611
SFX p ik d szik 21609
SFX p ik d [^t]ik 21609
SFX p 0 öttük [lnrz]d 21612
SFX p 0 öttük [ln]l 21612
SFX p 0 öttük [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21612
SFX p 0 öttük [gn]g 21612
SFX p 0 öttétek [lnrz]d 21613
SFX p 0 öttétek [ln]l 21613
SFX p 0 öttétek [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21613
SFX p 0 öttétek [gn]g 21613
SFX p 0 ötték [lnrz]d 21614
SFX p 0 ötték [ln]l 21614
SFX p 0 ötték [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21614
SFX p 0 ötték [gn]g 21614
SFX p 0 öttem [lnrz]d 21615
SFX p 0 öttem [ln]l 21615
SFX p 0 öttem [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21615
SFX p 0 öttelek [lnrz]d 21616
SFX p 0 öttelek [ln]l 21616
SFX p 0 öttelek [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21616
SFX p 0 ötted [lnrz]d 21617
SFX p 0 ötted [ln]l 21617
SFX p 0 ötted [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21617
SFX p 0 ötte [lnrz]d 21618
SFX p 0 ötte [ln]l 21618
SFX p 0 ötte [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21618
SFX p 0 öm [^k] 21619
SFX p 0 öd [^k] 21620
SFX p 0 zük z 21602
SFX p 0 zük [^ds]z 21601
SFX p 0 zétek [^ds]z 21603
SFX p 0 zék [^ds]z 21605
SFX p 0 zem [^ds]z 21607
SFX p 0 zelek [^ds]z 21608
SFX p 0 zed [^s]z 21609
SFX p 0 ze [^ds]z 21610
SFX p 0 tük [^tóúőűk] 21612
SFX p 0 tük [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21612
SFX p 0 tétek [^tk] 21613
SFX p 0 tétek [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21613
SFX p 0 ték [^tk] 21614
SFX p 0 ték [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21614
SFX p 0 tem [^tk] 21615
SFX p 0 tem [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21615
SFX p 0 telek [^tk] 21616
SFX p 0 telek [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21616
SFX p 0 ted [^tk] 21617
SFX p 0 ted [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21617
SFX p 0 te [^tk] 21618
SFX p 0 te [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t 21618
SFX p 0 sük s 21601
SFX p 0 sük s 21602
SFX p 0 sük [^szüöieuoa]t 21601
SFX p 0 sétek s 21603
SFX p 0 sétek [^szüöieuoa]t 21603
SFX p 0 sék s 21605
SFX p 0 sék [^szüöieuoa]t 21605
SFX p 0 sem s 21607
SFX p 0 sem [^szüöieuoa]t 21607
SFX p 0 selek s 21608
SFX p 0 selek [^szüöieuoa]t 21608
SFX p 0 sed s 21609
SFX p 0 sed [^szüöieuoa]t 21609
SFX p 0 se s 21610
SFX p 0 se [^szüöieuoa]t 21610
SFX p 0 sd [^szüöieuoa]t 21609
SFX p 0 nők/1246 [aeioöuü]t 21621
SFX p 0 nők/1246 [^tk] 21621
SFX p 0 nétek [aeioöuü]t 21622
SFX p 0 nétek [^tk] 21622
SFX p 0 nénk [aeioöuü]t 21621
SFX p 0 nénk [^tk] 21621
SFX p 0 ném [aeioöuü]t 21623
SFX p 0 ném [^tk] 21623
SFX p 0 nélek [aeioöuü]t 21624
SFX p 0 nélek [^tk] 21624
SFX p 0 nék [aeioöuü]t 21625
SFX p 0 nék [^tk] 21625
SFX p 0 néd [aeioöuü]t 21626
SFX p 0 néd [^tk] 21626
SFX p 0 né [aeioöuü]t 21627
SFX p 0 né [^tk] 21627
SFX p 0 lek [^lk] 21611
SFX p 0 lek [^l]l 21611
SFX p 0 jük [^sztk] 21601
SFX p 0 jük [^szk] 21602
SFX p 0 jétek [^sztk] 21603
SFX p 0 jék [^sztk] 21605
SFX p 0 jem [^sztk] 21607
SFX p 0 jelek [^sztk] 21608
SFX p 0 jed [^sztk] 21609
SFX p 0 je [^sztk] 21610
SFX p 0 itek [^k] 21604
SFX p 0 ik [^k] 21606
SFX p 0 i [^k] 21628
SFX p 0 enők/1246 [lnrz]d 21621
SFX p 0 enők/1246 [ln]l 21621
SFX p 0 enők/1246 [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21621
SFX p 0 enők/1246 [gn]g 21621
SFX p 0 enétek [lnrz]d 21622
SFX p 0 enétek [ln]l 21622
SFX p 0 enétek [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21622
SFX p 0 enétek [gn]g 21621
SFX p 0 enénk [lnrz]d 21621
SFX p 0 enénk [ln]l 21621
SFX p 0 enénk [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21621
SFX p 0 enénk [gn]g 21621
SFX p 0 eném [lnrz]d 21623
SFX p 0 eném [ln]l 21623
SFX p 0 eném [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21623
SFX p 0 eném [gn]g 21623
SFX p 0 enélek [lnrz]d 21624
SFX p 0 enélek [ln]l 21624
SFX p 0 enélek [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21624
SFX p 0 enélek [gn]g 21624
SFX p 0 enék [lnrz]d 21625
SFX p 0 enék [ln]l 21625
SFX p 0 enék [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21625
SFX p 0 enék [gn]g 21625
SFX p 0 enéd [lnrz]d 21626
SFX p 0 enéd [ln]l 21626
SFX p 0 enéd [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21626
SFX p 0 enéd [gn]g 21626
SFX p 0 ené [lnrz]d 21627
SFX p 0 ené [ln]l 21627
SFX p 0 ené [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21627
SFX p 0 ené [gn]g 21627
SFX p 0 elek [lnrz]d 21611
SFX p 0 elek [jlmnrszáéíű]t 21611
SFX p 0 elek [gn]g 21611
SFX p 0 d [zd] 21609
SFX p 0 d [^tk] 21609
